Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201819-4016
Act, how construed.

The Business Improvement District Act provides a separate and additional method, authority, and procedure for the matters to which it relates and does not affect any other law relating to the same or similar subject. When proceeding under the act, only the provisions of the act need be followed.

Laws 1979, LB 251, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB168, § 2.